District of Columbia statutes.
2-359.02

Improper contracts.

(a)

A contract entered into in violation of this chapter or the rules issued pursuant to this chapter shall be void.

(b)

A contract entered into in violation of this chapter or the rules issued pursuant to this chapter shall not be void if:

(1)

It is determined in a proceeding pursuant to this chapter or subsequent judicial review that good faith has been shown by all parties; and

(2)

The violation of the provisions of this chapter and the rules issued pursuant to this chapter was de minimis.

(c)

If a contract is determined to be void under subsection (a) of this subsection, a contractor who has entered into the contract in good faith, without directly contributing to a violation and without knowledge of any violation of the act or rules issued pursuant to this chapter prior to the awarding of the contract, shall be compensated for costs actually incurred until the date that the contract was determined to be void.

Apr. 8, 2011, D.C. Law 18-371, § 902, 58 DCR 1185
This section is referenced in § 2-360.08.